FauxFur.xfst
e p (->) p e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p e (->) e p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e q (->) q e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q e (->) e q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e t (->) t e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t e (->) e t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I b (->) b I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b I (->) I b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I d (->) d I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d I (->) I d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I g (->) g I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g I (->) I g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I h (->) h I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h I (->) I h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I k (->) k I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k I (->) I k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I p (->) p I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p I (->) I p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I q (->) q I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q I (->) I q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I t (->) t I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t I (->) I t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o b (->) b o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b o (->) o b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o d (->) d o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d o (->) o d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o g (->) g o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g o (->) o g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o h (->) h o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h o (->) o h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o k (->) k o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k o (->) o k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o p (->) p o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p o (->) o p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o q (->) q o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q o (->) o q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o t (->) t o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t o (->) o t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u b (->) b u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b u (->) u b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u d (->) d u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d u (->) u d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u g (->) g u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g u (->) u g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u h (->) h u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h u (->) u h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u k (->) k u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k u (->) u k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u p (->) p u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p u (->) u p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u q (->) q u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q u (->) u q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u t (->) t u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t u (->) u t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
# m + vowel within
a m (->) m a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m a (->) a m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e m (->) m e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m e (->) e m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
i m (->) m i %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m i (->) i m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I m (->) m I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m I (->) I m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o m (->) m o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m o (->) o m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u m (->) m u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, m u (->) u m %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
# f + vowel within
a f (->) f a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f a (->) a f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e f (->) f e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f e (->) e f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
i f (->) f i %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f i (->) i f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I f (->) f I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f I (->) I f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o f (->) f o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f o (->) o f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u f (->) f u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, f u (->) u f %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
# l + vowel within
a l (->) l a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l a (->) a l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e l (->) l e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l e (->) e l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
i l (->) l i %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l i (->) i l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I l (->) l I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l I (->) I l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o l (->) l o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l o (->) o l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u l (->) l u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, l u (->) u l %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a %+ b (->) b %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ a (->) a %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ d (->) d %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ a (->) a %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ g (->) g %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ a (->) a %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ h (->) h %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ a (->) a %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ k (->) k %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ a (->) a %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ p (->) p %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ a (->) a %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ q (->) q %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ a (->) a %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ t (->) t %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ a (->) a %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ b (->) b %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ e (->) e %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ d (->) d %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ e (->) e %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ g (->) g %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ e (->) e %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ h (->) h %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ e (->) e %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ k (->) k %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ e (->) e %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ p (->) p %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ e (->) e %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ q (->) q %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ e (->) e %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ t (->) t %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ e (->) e %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ b (->) b %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ i (->) i %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ d (->) d %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ i (->) i %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ g (->) g %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ i (->) i %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ h (->) h %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ i (->) i %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ k (->) k %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ i (->) i %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ p (->) p %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ i (->) i %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ q (->) q %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ i (->) i %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ t (->) t %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ i (->) i %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ b (->) b %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ I (->) I %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ d (->) d %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ I (->) I %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ g (->) g %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ I (->) I %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ h (->) h %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ I (->) I %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ k (->) k %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ I (->) I %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ p (->) p %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ I (->) I %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ q (->) q %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ I (->) I %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ t (->) t %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ I (->) I %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ b (->) b %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ o (->) o %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ d (->) d %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ o (->) o %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ g (->) g %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ o (->) o %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ h (->) h %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ o (->) o %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ k (->) k %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ o (->) o %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ p (->) p %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ o (->) o %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ q (->) q %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ o (->) o %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ t (->) t %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ o (->) o %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ b (->) b %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ u (->) u %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ d (->) d %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ u (->) u %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ g (->) g %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ u (->) u %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ h (->) h %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ u (->) u %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ k (->) k %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ u (->) u %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ p (->) p %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ u (->) u %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ q (->) q %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ u (->) u %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ t (->) t %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ u (->) u %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
# last line can't have comma
# m + vowel between
a %+ m (->) m %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ a (->) a %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ m (->) m %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ e (->) e %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ m (->) m %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ i (->) i %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ m (->) m %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ I (->) I %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ m (->) m %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ o (->) o %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ m (->) m %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ u (->) u %+ m %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
# f + vowel between
a %+ f (->) f %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ a (->) a %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ f (->) f %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ e (->) e %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ f (->) f %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ i (->) i %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ f (->) f %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ I (->) I %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ f (->) f %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ o (->) o %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ f (->) f %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ u (->) u %+ f %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
# l + vowel between
a %+ l (->) l %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ a (->) a %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ l (->) l %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ e (->) e %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ l (->) l %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ i (->) i %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ l (->) l %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ I (->) I %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ l (->) l %+ o %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ o (->) o %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
u %+ l (->) l %+ u %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, l %+ u (->) u %+ l %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph
;
# Last line never has comma!

define Gen [ VoiceCoronal .o. Denasalize .o. Shuffle ] ;
#define Gen [ VoiceCoronal .o. Denasalize ] ;

######################### OT CONSTRAINTS #############################

# We use asterisks to mark constraint violations. Ordinary constraints
# such as Lapse assign single asterisks as the violation marks and the
# candidate with the fewest number is selected. Gradient constraints
# such as AllFeetFirst mark violations with sequences of asterisks.
# The number increases with distance from the word edge.

# Every instance of * in an output candidate is a violation.

define Viol ${*};

# We prune candidates with "lenient composition" that eliminates
# candidates that violate the constraint provided that at least
# one output candidate survives.

define Viol0 ~Viol;        # No violations
define Viol1 ~[Viol^2];    # At most one violation
define Viol2 ~[Viol^3];    # At most two violations
define Viol3 ~[Viol^4];    # etc.
define Viol4 ~[Viol^5];
define Viol5 ~[Viol^6];
define Viol6 ~[Viol^7];
define Viol7 ~[Viol^8];
define Viol8 ~[Viol^9];
define Viol9 ~[Viol^10];
define Viol10 ~[Viol^11];
define Viol11 ~[Viol^12];
define Viol12 ~[Viol^13];
define Viol13 ~[Viol^14];
define Viol14 ~[Viol^15];
define Viol15 ~[Viol^16];

# This eliminates the violation marks after the candidate set has
# been pruned by a constraint.

define Pardon {*} -> 0;

########################## CONSTRAINTS ##############################

# Faithfulness constraints

define LinearityBetweenMorphemes [ %+MetBetweenMorph -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityWithinMorpheme [ %+MetWithinMorph -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityVV [ %+MetVV -> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityCC [ %+MetCC-> ... {*}] ;

define LinearityCV [ %+MetCV-> ... {*}] ;

define IdentVoice [ %+DeltaVoice -> ... {*}] ;

define IdentNasal [ %+DeltaNasal -> ... {*}] ;

# Markedness constraints

define NoBL [ [ BILABIAL l ]/[GENTAGS | %+]-> ... {*}] ;

define NoSonTSon t -> t {*} || SONORANT/[GENTAGS | %+] _ SONORANT/[GENTAGS | %+ ];

define StrongRootInitCons [ NASAL -> ... {*} || BOUNDARY _ ] ;

########################## READABILITY ##############################
